Maryland, session 2026, SB0876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(o) “Recovery residence” means a service that:
(1) Provides alcohol–free and illicit–drug–free housing to individuals with
substance–related disorders or addictive disorders or co–occurring mental disorders and
substance–related disorders or addictive disorders; and
(2) Does not include clinical treatment services.
7.5–401.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a behavioral health
program shall be licensed by the Secretary before program services may be provided in this
State.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(b) The Secretary may exempt the following persons from the licensure
requirements of this section:
(2) Alcoholics Anonymous, Narcotics Anonymous, [recovery residences,]
peer support services, family support services, or other similar organizations, if the
organization holds meetings or provides support services but does not provide any type of
treatment;
19–2501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Certified recovery residence” means a recovery residence that holds a
certificate of compliance.
(e) “Recovery residence” has the meaning stated in § 7.5–101 of this article.
19–2501.1.

SENATE BILL 876 3
BEGINNING JANUARY JUNE 1, 2027, A RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL BE
CERTIFIED BY A CREDENTIALING ENTITY APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
§ 19–2502 OF THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE OPERATING IN THE STATE.
19–2502.
(a) The Department shall approve a credentialing entity to develop and
administer a certification process for recovery residences.
(b) The credentialing entity shall:
(1) Establish recovery residence certification requirements;
(2) Establish processes to administer the application, certification, and
recertification process;
(3) Establish processes to monitor and inspect a recovery residence;
(4) Conduct an on–site inspection of a recovery residence:
(i) Before issuing a certificate of compliance; and
(ii) At least once during each certification renewal period; and
(5) Issue a certificate of compliance on approval of the application process
and the inspection of the recovery residence.
(c) A certificate of compliance issued by the credentialing entity is valid for 1 year
from the date of issuance.
(d) The credentialing entity may revoke the certificate of compliance of a certified
recovery residence if the credentialing entity finds that the recovery residence is not in
compliance with the requirements established by the credentialing entity.
19–2503.
(a) (1) On or before October 1, 2017, the credentialing entity shall submit a list
to the Department of the recovery residences that have obtained a certificate of compliance.
(2) THE CREDENTIALING ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT AN UPDATED LIST TO
THE DEPARTMENT AS NECESSARY.
(b) [(1) On or before November 1, 2017, the] THE Department shall publish
AND MAINTAIN on its website:

SENATE BILL 876
[(i)] (1) A list of each credentialing entity and the contact
information for the credentialing entity; and
[(ii)] (2) A list of each CERTIFIED recovery residence operating in
each county in the State.
[(2) The list published under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection shall
indicate whether the owner of a recovery residence has received a valid certificate of
compliance.]
(c) (1) [On or before November 1, 2017, a] EACH credentialing entity shall
publish AND MAINTAIN on its website a list of each recovery residence that holds a valid
certificate of compliance.
(2) The list published under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
only the owner of the recovery residence and the contact information of the owner.
19–2504.
(a) A person may not advertise, represent, or imply to the public that a recovery
residence is a certified recovery residence unless the recovery residence has obtained a
certificate of compliance under this subtitle.
(b) (1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is subject to a civil
penalty imposed by the Department not exceeding $1,000 for each offense.
(2) In setting the amount of a civil penalty under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Department shall consider the nature, number, and seriousness of the
violations, the ability of the [certified] recovery residence to pay the penalty, and any other
factors the Department determines are relevant.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.